Maine, session 132, LD1114.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §1511 is enacted to read:
§1511. Pension for spouses or children
If a corrections officer dies as a result of injury received in the line of duty, the spouse
or, if none, the minor child or children of the corrections officer must receive a pension
equal to 1/2 of the pay of the corrections officer at the time of death, but in no case may the
pension be less than $1,000 annually. The pension must be paid to the spouse until the
spouse dies or remarries or, if there is no spouse, to a child or children until the child or
children die or attain 18 years of age. For the purposes of this section, "corrections officer"
means a person who is responsible for the custody or direct supervision of a person
confined in a county jail pursuant to an order of a court or as a result of an arrest and who
possesses a valid certificate issued by the Board of Trustees of the Maine Criminal Justice
Academy pursuant to Title 25, section 2803-A.